Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-735
Mortgage loan originator; employee or independent agent; restriction on activities and remote work arrangements; written agency contract; notification to department; fee; notice of termination.

(1) A mortgage loan originator shall be an employee or independent agent of a single Nebraska licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company that shall directly supervise, control, and maintain responsibility for the acts and omissions of the mortgage loan originator.

(2)(a) A mortgage loan originator shall not engage in mortgage loan origination activities at any location that is not a main office location of a licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company or a branch office of a licensed mortgage banker or registrant. The licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company shall designate the location or locations at which each mortgage loan originator is originating residential mortgage loans.

(b) The department may adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, and orders to authorize and regulate the use of remote work arrangements conducted outside of a main office location or branch office by employees or agents, including mortgage loan originators, of licensed mortgage bankers, registrants, or installment loan companies.

(3) Any licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company who engages an independent agent as a mortgage loan originator shall maintain a written agency contract with such mortgage loan originator. Such written agency contract shall provide that the mortgage loan originator is originating loans exclusively for the licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company.

(4) A licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company that has hired a licensed mortgage loan originator as an employee or entered into an independent agent agreement with such licensed mortgage loan originator shall provide notification to the department as soon as reasonably possible after entering into such relationship, along with a fee of fifty dollars. The employing entity shall not allow the mortgage loan originator to conduct such activity in this state prior to such notification to the department and confirmation that the department has received notice of the termination of the mortgage loan originator's prior employment.

(5) A licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company shall notify the department no later than ten days after the termination, whether voluntary or involuntary, of a mortgage loan originator unless the mortgage loan originator has previously notified the department of the termination.

Laws 2009, LB328, § 20;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 69;

Laws 2026, LB717, § 32.
July 18, 2026